Wyoming, session 2025, SF0038.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-409(e)(vi)(C) and by creating a
new subparagraph (D) and 9-3-406(a)(vi)(C) and by creating
a new subparagraph (D) are amended to read:
9-1-409. State treasurer; duties generally; demand
accounts; state revenues paid to treasurer.
(e) The state treasurer may implement and administer
a performance compensation plan in accordance with this
subsection. The plan shall:
(vi) Provide that payments for investment
performance for any one (1) investment period shall be as
follows:
(C) For payments earned in fiscal year 2022
and each through fiscal year thereafter 2025 - the
arithmetic average of the annual investment performance
beginning that fiscal year and the two (2) immediately
preceding fiscal years;.
(D) For payments earned in fiscal year 2026
and each fiscal year thereafter – the geometric average of
the annual investment performance beginning that fiscal
year and the two (2) immediately preceding fiscal years.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0038
ENROLLED ACT NO. 79, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
9-3-406. Retirement board; employment and
compensation of director, consulting actuary and
assistants; director designated secretary; compensation of
members; quorum; seal.
(a) The board shall employ a director and a
consulting actuary and other professional and clerical
assistants necessary for the administration of the
retirement system and the Wyoming deferred compensation
program established under W.S. 9-3-501 through 9-3-508. The
compensation of employees shall be fixed by the board,
subject to confirmation and approval by the human resources
division and together with all other necessary expenses of
the board shall be paid by vouchers drawn on the state
treasurer of Wyoming. The director shall also serve,
without additional compensation, as secretary of the board.
The board shall have the authority to obtain the financial
and criminal background history of an employee or
employment applicant of the Wyoming retirement system in
accordance with W.S. 7-19-106 and 7-19-201. In fixing
compensation of employees the board may implement and
administer a performance compensation plan in accordance
with this subsection. The plan shall:
(vi) Provide that payments for investment
performance for any one (1) investment period shall be as
follows:
(C) For payments earned in fiscal year 2022
and each through fiscal year thereafter 2025 - the
arithmetic average of the annual investment performance
beginning that fiscal year and the two (2) immediately
preceding fiscal years;.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0038
ENROLLED ACT NO. 79, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(D) For payments earned in fiscal year 2026
and each fiscal year thereafter – the geometric average of
the annual investment performance beginning that fiscal
year and the two (2) immediately preceding fiscal years.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3